Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3810
Land owned or controlled by state
or political subdivision; payment of cost.

The cost of managing colonies on all land owned or controlled
by a state department, agency, commission, or board or a political subdivision
shall be paid by the state department, agency, commission, or board in control
thereof or the political subdivision out of funds appropriated to the state
department, agency, commission, or board or budgeted by the political subdivision
for its use.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 10.